Louisiana, session 2026, HB26.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:2225.4(A)(2)(b)(ii) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§2225.4. Unfunded accrued liability; payment by employer
A.
* * *
(2)
* * *
(b) A participating employer shall be deemed to have partially dissolved its
police department if either of the following occurs:
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-317 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 26
(ii) The number of participating employees of the employer as of June
thirtieth is at least fifty one hundred fewer than the number of participating
employees of the employer as of June thirtieth of the prior year.
* * *